Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 6 Fees
21-6-304. Coroners.

Coroners shall be allowed fees as follows:

For viewing a dead body in case of inquisition of death$ 7.50

For summoning each witness.50

For each deposition duly taken and returned.50

For summoning and swearing jury, taking and returning inquisition25.00

For taking each recognizance .50

For arresting any person whom, according to the inquisition or otherwise, he or she may be bound to arrest 1.00

For going from his or her residence to the place of viewing a dead body and returning, each mile.20

For each mile traveled in arresting any person and committing such person.20

For each and every mile traveled in answering call wherein inquest is found not necessary, each mile.05

For each and every day for making the call and report to the circuit clerk where inquest is found not necessary 5.00.

Such fees, together with the fees of the jurors and witnesses, shall be paid out of the county treasury as other demands.

For performing the duties of sheriff, the coroner shall be entitled to the same fees for the time being as are allowed to sheriffs for such services.

When an autopsy is necessary in determination of the cause of death at coroner's inquest, the county is liable for reasonable compensation to the physician performing the autopsy. St. Francis County v. Cummings, 55 Ark. 419, 18 S.W. 461 (1892).

The coroner will not be allowed fees for conducting an inquest when it is evident before the inquest that death was due to natural causes. Clark County v. Callaway, 52 Ark. 361, 12 S.W. 756 (1890).

Cited: Partain v. Greene County, 158 Ark. 305, 250 S.W. 23 (1923).

For the first ten thousand dollars ($10,000) collected, five percent (5%) in kind;

For all sums over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and under twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) collected, four and one-half percent (4.5%) in kind;

For all sums over twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) collected, four percent (4%) in kind; and

For the amount of real property tax reduction certified to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, four percent (4%) in kind.

Commissions received by the county collector shall be used by the county collector to offset administrative costs.

The county collector may set aside up to ten percent (10%) of the gross commissions collected annually to be credited to the county collector's automation fund:

To operate the office of the county collector;

For administrative costs; and

To purchase, maintain, and operate an automated record-keeping system.

The acquisition and update of software for the automated accounting and record-keeping system shall be a permitted use of these funds.

Moneys deposited into this fund may accumulate and shall be appropriated and expended for the uses designated in this section by the quorum court at the direction of the county collector.

All moneys not used by the county collector to offset administrative costs or set aside into the county collector's automation fund shall be prorated to the appropriate taxing entities.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment by No. 1215 added present (c) and (d) and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment by No. 1275 inserted “and for certifying … §26-26-310” in the introductory language of (a); deleted former (a)(4), (b), and (c); and added present (a)(4) and (b).

The 2003 amendment redesignated former (c)(2)(A) as present (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(A)(iii); and inserted present (c)(2)(A)(i) and (c)(2)(A)(ii).

Commission for collection of road taxes is determined from the total amount of all taxes collected. Road Imp. Dist. v. Smith, 164 Ark. 522, 262 S.W. 314 (1924).

Where the Auditor of State settled with a tax collector on the basis of this section instead of a special act (Acts 1917, No. 48) providing fees for that tax collector, thereby leaving in his hands a sum as commission on the state taxes to which he was not entitled under the special act, the county was not entitled to such surplus. Independence County v. Wright, 154 Ark. 184, 241 S.W. 903 (1922).

Cited: Venhaus v. Board of Educ., 280 Ark. 441, 659 S.W.2d 179 (1983).

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “eight dollars ($8.00)” for “six dollars ($6.00)” and “three dollars ($3.00)” for “two dollars ($2.00)”; and substituted “section that are” for “section which are” in (a)(2).

The 2003 amendment added (c)(2)(B).

The 2009 amendment deleted “writs of execution, writs of garnishment” in (a)(1)(A), and made a related change.

Cross References. Circuit court clerks as ex officio recorders, §14-14-1301.

Acknowledgment of satisfaction on record, §18-40-104.

The General Assembly, by adopting this section, established a standard amount of recording fee and preempted a field that otherwise could have been validly regulated by county ordinance. Kollmeyer v. Greer, 267 Ark. 632, 593 S.W.2d 29 (1980).

Where the ordinances of a county quorum court which levied additional local recording fees on deeds and other instruments were inconsistent and in conflict with this section, those ordinances exceeded the local legislative authority granted to the counties by Ark. Const. Amend. 55 and §14-14-801 et seq. and were, therefore, void and the moneys collected thereunder had to be refunded. Kollmeyer v. Greer, 267 Ark. 632, 593 S.W.2d 29 (1980).

For serving every summons, capias, scire facias, attachment, writ of garnishment, writ of injunction, or subpoena$ 30.00

For serving a writ of execution100.00

For commission for receiving and paying money on execution or process when lands or goods have been taken into custody, advertised, or sold 10%

For every return of a writ, summons, or subpoena, original or judicial 20.00

For executing a writ of inquiry 20.00

For executing a certificate of purchase for real estate under execution 20.00

For making, executing, and subscribing a sheriff's deed to be paid by purchaser 30.00

For serving each order, notice, or rule of any court 30.00

For serving each notice to vacate 30.00

For advertising goods or lands for sale 30.00

For returning each execution or attachment 20.00

For advertising elections in each voting precinct 20.00

For delivering voter registration books for each voting

precinct 20.00

For serving warrant or order of arrest from anycourt 50.00

For taking and entering every bail or delivery bond 20.00

For attending every trial of a criminal or civil case of confession in open court 20.00

For serving subpoena for special jurors 20.00.

All funds so designated shall be invested by the sheriff in an interest-bearing account or certificate of deposit into one (1) or more banking institutions domiciled within the State of Arkansas and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

All sums paid into the communications facility and equipment fund by the sheriff may accumulate as to principal and interest until such time as the deposits or a portion thereof are needed by the sheriff to:

Train operations staff;

Operate, equip, repair, or replace existing communications equipment;

Purchase additional communications equipment;

Otherwise improve a communications facility or system for the sheriff's department; or

Purchase vehicles, weapons, or other equipment for the sheriff's department.

At the discretion of the sheriff, any funds not needed by the sheriff for any of the purposes under this subdivision (b)(2) may be transferred to the county general fund.

The court clerk shall on or before the fifteenth day of each month transmit to the sheriff the fees collected under this section, and the sheriff shall dispose of the fees as provided in this section.

If more persons than one (1) are named in a writ, process, or subpoena, fees shall be charged for each named, unless parties reside or are employed in the same location.

The fees provided shall be for serving of process from any of the several courts of the county.

The fees set forth in this section shall be the sole and exclusive fees to be charged by the sheriffs of the several counties of this state for each of the services enumerated in this section.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment substituted “30.00” for “15.00” in (a)(1) and (a)(7)-(10); substituted “100.00” for “50.00” in (a)(2); substituted “10%” for “7%” in (a)(3); substituted “20.00” for “10.00” in (a)(4)-(6), (a)(11)-(13), and (a)(15)-(17); and substituted “50.00” for “25.00” in (a)(14).

The 2003 amendment inserted “to” preceding “his” twice in (b)(1); and added (b)(2)(D).

The 2015 amendment added (b)(2)(C)(v).

The right of a sheriff to charge fees is derived from and dependent on statute and he is not entitled to any compensation except as is given to him by law. Miller County v. Magee, 177 Ark. 752, 7 S.W.2d 973 (1928) (decision under prior law); Campbell v. White, 294 Ark. 656, 746 S.W.2d 42 (1988).

Where the sheriff had not collected the amount of a forfeited bond, he was not entitled to a collection fee. McInturf v. State, 175 Ark. 388, 299 S.W. 388 (1927) (decision under prior law).

The sheriff was entitled to fees for serving on the judges of election notice of their appointment. Ouachita County v. Chidester, 99 Ark. 206, 137 S.W. 811 (1911) (decision under prior law).

In a suit to enforce a lien on 66 tracts of land belonging to one person, where 66 copies of the summons were served on the owner, the sheriff was entitled to one fee therefor, service of only one copy being necessary. Sewer Dist. v. School Dist., 70 Ark. 59, 66 S.W. 152 (1902) (decision under prior law).

Although special act creating a municipal court provided certain duties to be performed by the constable, where process from the municipal court was directed to the sheriff, he was entitled to fees for the service. Miller County v. Magee, 177 Ark. 752, 7 S.W.2d 973 (1928) (decision under prior law).

Subdivision (a)(2) does not authorize a fee for serving a writ of execution when the sheriff is unable to levy upon a defendant's property or to notify a defendant, by serving him a copy of the writ, of the sheriff's intention to levy on the defendant's property. Campbell v. White, 294 Ark. 656, 746 S.W.2d 42 (1988).

Cited: City of Greenbrier v. Cotton, 293 Ark. 264, 737 S.W.2d 444 (1987).

For serving a warrant in a criminal case, for each

defendant$ 2.00

For taking a criminal to jail2.00

For summoning each jury before a justice of the peace1.00

For levying each execution2.00

For taking each delivery bond1.00

For summoning each witness .75

For levying a writ of attachment2.00

For every return of non est on a writ, original or

judicial, or subpoena .20

For return of nulla bona .20

For attending a trial of each case in the court of a

justice of the peace .50

For attending and calling court at each trial upon

continuance .50

For care of each prisoner while in actual custody for

each day .75

For summoning each defendant2.00.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “may” for “shall” preceding “fix” in (a).

Cross References. Townships containing city having district court or state-supported educational institution, constables not entitled to fees in criminal cases, §16-17-114.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “may” for “shall” in the introductory paragraph in (a); and added (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

Ark. L. Rev.

Official Misconduct under the Arkansas Criminal Code, 30 Ark. L. Rev. 160.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by No. 405 substituted “ten (10) days” for “five (5) days” in (a).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1158 added (a)(2); and inserted “a” preceding “deposit” in (b).

The 2015 amendment substituted “account balances belonging to the inmate and” for “accounts” in (a)(2).

Cross References. Forfeiture of fees for improper taxation of costs, §16-68-409.

Legal Education Fund, §6-64-601 et seq.

Payment of fees as prerequisite to entry of action or issuance of writ, §16-58-101.

Effective Dates. Acts 1875, No. 77, § 53: effective on passage.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 15: effective on passage.

Acts 1887, No. 89, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1889, No. 7, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1895, No. 145, § 9: effective on passage.

Acts 1917, No. 251, § 2: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 16, 1917.

Acts 1929, No. 172, § 40: approved Mar. 22, 1929. Emergency clause provided: “It is ascertained and hereby declared that the present system of assessing property for taxation is defective, unfair, unjust and inequitable; that the changes herein contemplated are necessary in order to bring about a more equitable distribution of the costs of government, so that the immediate operation of the Act is essential for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and an emergency is therefore declared, and this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1945, No. 55, § 3: Feb. 16, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “All laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed, and because of the confusion and uncertainty existing in the various counties throughout the State under the present laws relative to the legal fees entitled to be charged by the Circuit and Chancery Clerks and Recorders in this State for the services they render, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1947, No. 111, § 4: July 1, 1947. “All laws and parts of laws enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas in conflict herewith are hereby repealed, effective July 1, 1947.

“APPROVED: February 24, 1947.”

Acts 1947, No. 221, § 4: Mar. 18, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the fees now being paid to justices of the peace and constables of this State are totally inadequate to compensate them for the services rendered; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 309, § 2: Mar. 26, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the confusion and uncertainty existing in the various counties throughout the State under the present laws relative to the legal fees entitled to be charged by the County and Probate Clerks in the State of Arkansas, for the services they render, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 132, § 3: Feb. 22, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that the funds available to the Supreme Court for the maintenance and improvement of the Supreme Court Library are grossly inadequate, that there is urgent need for additional funds, and that enactment of this bill will provide the additional necessary funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 307, § 3: Mar. 21, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in the case of Doty v. Goodwin, 246 Ark. 149 (1969) the Arkansas Supreme Court held that a justice of the peace could not have a pecuniary interest in convicting the accused; that this means that justices of the peace in this State will have to try all criminal cases without any compensation since no provision has been made for reimbursing such justices of the peace other than upon a fee system based on the conviction of the accused; that some counties in this State do not have municipal courts; and that in order to remedy this situation, it is necessary that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 657, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, May 29, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in the case of Doty v. Goodwin, 246 Ark. 149 (1969) the Arkansas Supreme Court held that a justice of the peace could not have a pecuniary interest in convicting the accused; that this means that justices of the peace in this State will have to try all criminal cases without any compensation since no provision has been made for reimbursing such justices of the peace other than upon a fee system based on the conviction of the accused; that in order to remedy this situation, it is necessary that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 333, § 6: Mar. 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of uniform advance fees to be charged for causes of action by the clerks in the various circuit and chancery courts of this State is necessary to provide for the efficient operation of said offices and to minimize the necessity of maintaining separate accounts for various fees; that the fees charged by county recorders are not now adequate to reimburse the county for the service of recording instruments, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to promote the efficient administration of justice in this State and to enable counties to recover reasonable fees for services rendered by recorders. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 601, § 4: approved Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly that the filing fees for proceedings in the Supreme Court have remained unchanged since 1977 in spite of inflationary trends and greatly increased costs, particularly in the field of legal publications. As a result, the cost of maintenance and improvement of the Supreme Court Library increased to the extent that financial resources for that purpose have been virtually exhausted. Since the fees paid for filing appeals and petitions are a substantial part of the resources devoted to the maintenance and improvement of the Supreme Court Library and there is a dire need for enhancement of those resources, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 824, § 12: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the practice of court reporting should be regulated by the Arkansas Supreme Court and that the salaries of court reporters should be set and appropriated by the State, and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 12: Nov. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that some of the provisions of Act 824 of 1981, which provides that the official court reporters of the circuit and chancery courts in the State are state employees, and provides for the levy and collection of additional court costs to pay the salaries and expenses of reporters, are vague and difficult to interpret, and that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of justice that this Act be given effect immediately to clarify the law relating to court reporters. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 5: Dec. 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, meeting in Extraordinary Session, that the passage of this Act is necessary for continued efficient operation of the Circuit and Chancery Courts and to pay authorized salaries for the official Court Reporters. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 534, § 10: Mar. 14, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the fees currently charged for filing and recording instruments for initiation of actions in the circuit and chancery courts and for other official functions of the circuit and chancery courts are inadequate and should be increased immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 34, § 6: Nov. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that since the passage of Act 273 of 1989 there has arisen the need to clarify that certain cases brought by the prosecuting attorney or the Department of Human Services have traditionally been brought without the necessity of payment of a filing fee to the court clerk; that additional confusion has arisen over an unnecessary requirement that the prosecuting attorney accompany delinquency petitions with a supporting affidavit of facts; that these two requirements constitute a burden on the juvenile justice system of this state; that it is in the best interests of all citizens of this state that these matters be clarified; that this act should become effective immediately upon its passage to alleviate these concerns. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 23: Apr. 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current system of funding the state judicial system has created inequity in the level of judicial services available to the citizens of the state; and it is further determined that the current method of financing the state judicial system has become so complex as to make the administration of the system impossible, and the lack of reliable data on the current costs of the state judicial system prohibits any comprehensive change in the funding of the system at this time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 788, § 36: became law without the Governor's signature. Noted Mar. 11, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the state court system, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental progress. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1341, § 35: became law without the Governor's signature. Noted Apr. 11, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the state court system, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental progress. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2007, No. 663, § 56, as amended by Acts 2009, No. 345, §7, provided:

“(a)Sections 2 through 15 of this act are effective January 1, 2008.

“(b)Sections 16 through 50 and 52 through 55 of this act are effective January 1, 2012.

“(c)Section 51 of Act 663 of 2007 is effective January 1, 2012, except:

“(1)That portion of Section 51 of Act 663 of 2007 that is referred to in Act 663 of 2007 as16-17-933, establishing the Cleburne County District Court and departments of that court, codified as §16-17-936 is effective July 1, 2009; and

“(2)That portion of Section 51 of Act 663 of 2007 that is referred to in Act 663 of 2007 as16-17-950, establishing the St. Francis County District Court and departments of that court, codified as §16-17-954 is effective July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2013, No. 282, § 17: Mar. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one-year period; that the effectiveness of this act as soon as possible is essential to the operation of the judiciary and the administration of justice; and that this act is immediately necessary because the delay in the effective date of this act could cause irreparable harm upon the proper administration of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The fee shall be prorated among the parties filing briefs and paid by each party at the time the brief is filed except that if the Attorney General is requested to file a brief, he or she shall not be required to pay any portion of the fee.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid by the petitioner, in advance, for each petition for rehearing of a decision of the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

If the judgment of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals is in favor of the appellant or petitioner, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall tax the fee provided in this subsection in favor of the appellant or petitioner.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment of §21-6-401 by Acts 2009, No. 328, § 5, is superseded by the amendment of §21-6-401 by Acts 2009, No. 633, § 20.As amended by Acts 2009, No. 328, § 5, § 21-6-401 read as follows:

“21-6-401. Clerk of Supreme Court.

“(a)(1) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid by the appellant or petitioner, in advance, in all civil actions and misdemeanors filed in either the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

“(2) (A) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a certified question from a federal court;

“(B) The fee shall be prorated among the parties filing briefs and paid by each party at the time the brief is filed except that if the Arkansas Attorney General is requested to file a brief, he or she shall not be required to pay any portion of the fee.

“(3) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid by the petitioner, in advance, for each petition for rehearing of a decision of the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

“(4) If the judgment of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals is in favor of the appellant or petitioner, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall tax the fee provided in this subsection in favor of the appellant or petitioner.

“(b)(1) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid by the petitioner, in advance, for each petition for review of a decision of the Court of Appeals filed in the Supreme Court a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

“(2) If the decision of the Court of Appeals is reversed by the Supreme Court, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall tax the fee provided in this subsection in favor of the petitioner.

“(c) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall also be allowed:

“(1) For each certificate and seal …… $ 1.00

“(2) For acknowledging each deed …… .50

“(3) For copies of papers and records per page …… .50

“(4) For other services, the same fees allowed clerks of the circuit court.

“(d) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid in advance in all civil actions and misdemeanors filed in either the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for every motion, response, and similar paper.

“(e) The Supreme Court may implement a case management system for the courts of the state that may include electronic filing and public online access to court decisions and other court records, and the Supreme Court by court rule may establish a reasonable fee for access and related use.

“(f) All of the collected fees provided for in subsections (a)(1), (a)(4), (b), and (c) of this section shall be deposited in a bank to the account of the Supreme Court Library Fund, to be used by the Supreme Court for the maintenance and improvement of the Supreme Court Library.

“(g) All of the collected fees provided for in subsections (a)(2), (a)(3), (d), and (e) of this section shall be remitted by the Clerk of the Supreme Court on or before the fifteenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration on a form provided by that office for deposit in the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by §16-13-712.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (c)(4); redesignated former (c)(5) as present (c)(4); added (f); substituted “Supreme Court” for “clerk” in (d); deleted “and (d)” in (e); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 328, in (a), inserted (a)(2) and (a)(3) and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly; deleted “which shall be full payment of all the costs in the proceedings” following “($150)” in (a)(1) and following “($25.00)” in (b)(1); inserted (d) and redesignated the subsequent subsections accordingly; rewrote (e); inserted “collected” and “(1), (a)(4)” in (f); rewrote (g); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 633 inserted (a)(2) and (a)(3), deleted (d), and redesignated accordingly; deleted “which shall be full payment of all the costs in the proceedings” following the dollar amounts in (a)(1) and (b)(1); rewrote (d); substituted “(a)(1), (a)(4)” for “(a)” in (e); rewrote (f); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

In the absence of statutory authority, the Supreme Court cannot make an exception in divorce cases from the requirement of payment of the docket fee as a prerequisite to its jurisdiction. In re Smith, 183 Ark. 1025, 39 S.W.2d 703 (1931).

This section does not permit the collection of a filing fee in a felony case. Langley v. State, 343 Ark. 324, 34 S.W.3d 364 (2001).

The appellant was properly required to pay a $100 filing fee where she appealed from a judgment entered against her on both a misdemeanor charge and felony charges. Langley v. State, 343 Ark. 324, 34 S.W.3d 364 (2001).

(1)The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid by the petitioner, in advance, for each petition for review of a decision of the Court of Appeals filed in the Supreme Court a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall also be allowed:

The Supreme Court may implement a case management system for the courts of the state that may include electronic filing and public online access to court decisions and other court records, and the Supreme Court by court rule may establish a reasonable fee for access and related use.

All of the collected fees provided in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(4) of this section and subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be deposited into a bank to the account of the Supreme Court Library Fund, to be used by the Supreme Court for the maintenance and improvement of the Supreme Court Library.

All of the collected fees provided in subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section and subsection (d) of this section shall be remitted by the Clerk of the Supreme Court on or before the fifteenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section on a form provided by the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration for deposit into the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.

(1)The fees to be charged by the clerks of the circuit courts for the following matters in the circuit courts in the state shall be as prescribed in this section.

The fees shall be:

Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per page for the first one thousand (1,000) pages;

Two dollars ($2.00) per page for pages one thousand one (1,001) through two thousand (2,000);

One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page for pages two thousand one (2,001) through three thousand (3,000);

One dollar ($1.00) per page for pages three thousand one (3,001) through four thousand (4,000); and

Fifty cents (50¢) per page for any page over four thousand one (4,001);

For indexing each page.25

For certifying costs2.50

For authentication certificate5.00

For filing an application for appointment to serve civil process under Supreme Court Administrative Order Number 20 140.00

For filing a renewal of an appointment to serve civil process under Supreme Court Administrative Order Number 2050.00.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 328, §§ 1 and 2, provided:

“Pursuant to Arkansas Code §16-10-101 and16-10-102, the Arkansas Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of the Courts, is responsible for the design, purchase, implementation, and operation of a comprehensive automated court management system for use by all district, circuit, and appellate courts in the State of Arkansas.

“In 2001, the Arkansas Supreme Court created the Arkansas Court Automation Project to carry out these responsibilities and appointed the Arkansas Supreme Court Committee on Automation to oversee the project. Since that time a comprehensive system has been bid and purchased, redesigned for maximum use in Arkansas courts, and implemented in a number of pilot courts in the state. The system is now completed and scheduled for distribution and use by all of the courts in the state.

“The purpose of this Act is to provide a structure for the perpetual staffing and operation of the system so that the system is self-supporting and all funding is generated by and through use of the system and without any use of the general revenue funds of the State of Arkansas.

“This Act is to be known as the ‘Court Technology Improvement Act of 2009’.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote (8).

The 2003 amendment deleted “and chancery” following “circuit” in the section catchline and introductory language; and substituted “10.00” for “4.00” in (9).

The 2005 amendment by 919 inserted the subsection (a) designation; inserted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” in present (a); and added (b).

The 2005 amendment by 1934 substituted “5.00” for “2.00” in (10) and added (15).

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a) and (b); and redesignated former (b) as (c).

The 2011 amendment deleted “each page in” and “2.50” in the present introductory language of (b)(4); and inserted (b)(4)(A) through (E).

The 2013 amendment inserted “per page” throughout (b)(4).

Ark. L. Rev.

Divorce — Indigent's Right to Avoid Payment of Filing Fees, 26 Ark. L. Rev. 87.

The clerk is without power to waive statutory fees. McCourtney v. Morrow, 216 Ark. 959, 229 S.W.2d 124 (1950).

Filing an appeal from municipal court is “initiating a cause of action” in the circuit court under §21-6-403 so that an advance fee must be paid under this section. Neeley v. Barber, 288 Ark. 384, 706 S.W.2d 358 (1986).

The filing fee charged for appealing to the circuit court is collected no matter whether the defendant is tried by a jury or by the judge or even if the prosecution ends without any trial at all. Neeley v. Barber, 288 Ark. 384, 706 S.W.2d 358 (1986).

The circuit clerk was not entitled to any fee for a certificate of attendance to jury commissioners. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).

Neither §16-10-301 to16-10-305 nor §21-6-402 to21-6-406 refer to a fee that may be charged by bailiffs, clerks, or the courts for potential juror information. Therefore, a circuit court erred when it refused to refund a $3.00 fee charged by a bailiff for potential juror information in a criminal case.Aikens v. State, 368 Ark. 641, 249 S.W.3d 788 (2007).

The circuit clerk was entitled to his fee for every record entry indexed. Trimble v. St. Louis & S.F. Ry., 56 Ark. 249, 19 S.W. 839 (1892) (decision under prior law).

The county was liable to circuit clerk for the fee provided in this section for swearing and entering the regular panels of grand and petit jurors and for the fee in all criminal cases in which the county was chargeable with the costs for service in entering and swearing the jury in such case. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law). See McDonald v. Logan County, 55 Ark. 577, 18 S.W. 1047 (1892) (decision under prior law).

The circuit clerk was entitled to a fee for swearing jurors on their voir dire and witnesses to their attendance and, if the county was liable for the costs of the case, those fees were properly chargeable to it. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).
